Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2138.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 23-1021.01, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE23-1021.01. Peace officers; firefighters; employment status; definition A. A peace officer or fire fighter as defined in section 1-215 firefighter who is injured or killed while traveling directly to or from work as a peace officer or firefighter shall be considered in the course and scope of employment solely for the purposes of eligibility for workers' compensation benefits, provided that the peace officer or fire fighter firefighter is not engaged in criminal activity. B. Nothing in This section shall does not create any liability on the part of the peace officer's or fire fighter's firefighter's employer for any civil damages occurring through the peace officer's or fire fighter's firefighter's negligent or intentional conduct while traveling to or from work as a peace officer. C. For the purposes of this section, "firefighter" means a professional firefighter who is any of the following: 1. A state firefighter. 2. a member of a city or town fire department. 3. A member of a fire district fire department. 4. A member of a fire authority. END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR APRIL 13, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE APRIL 13, 2026.